California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
The state shall annually reimburse cities and counties for the net loss of revenue from each statute enacted after January 1, 1973, which provides for a sales or use tax exemption. The reimbursement shall be made, when funds have been appropriated by the Legislature, as follows:

(a) Twenty percent of the local net loss shall be distributed to the counties in the same ratio as the total amount of sales and use taxes collected in each county is to the whole. This amount of money shall be deposited by the board of supervisors in the local transportation fund established pursuant to Section 29530 of the Government Code. These moneys shall become part of the local transportation fund and shall be appropriated in the same manner and for the same purposes specified in Section 29531 of the Government Code.

(b) Eighty percent of the local net loss shall be distributed to cities and counties in the same ratio as provided in Section 30462 for the distribution of moneys from the Cigarette Tax Fund.

The distribution of reimbursement moneys pursuant to this section shall be made at the same time and in the same manner as provided in Section 30462 for the distribution of moneys from the Cigarette Tax Fund.

For purposes of this section the Director of Finance shall estimate the annual net loss of revenue to local agencies. In the case of legislative bills which provide for a sales or use tax exemption, the Director of Finance shall prepare an estimate of the annual net loss of revenue to local agencies during the initial fiscal year in which the bill becomes effective. An appropriation consistent with such estimate shall be included in the bill. In subsequent fiscal years an appropriation to reimburse local agencies as required by this section shall be included in the State Budget. The amount included each year in the State Budget shall be changed by the estimated percentage change from the prior year, in the amount of revenue distributed to cities and counties pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2.

For purposes of this section the net loss of revenue does not include (i) potential revenue from the sale or use of property of a type which was not being taxed on January 1, 1973, or (ii) the amount which would have been deducted by the Board of Equalization pursuant to Section 7204.3 for the cost of administering local sales and use tax ordinances.

In lieu of distributing reimbursement revenue as provided in this section, any statute exempting property from sales or use tax may provide an alternative procedure for such distribution.

Any claim alleging that the reimbursement requirements of this section have not been complied with shall be presented directly to the Legislature and the provisions of Sections 905.2 and 945.4 of the Government Code shall not apply thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2230.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 2229 and 2230, prior to the end of each calendar year, commencing with the 1978 calendar year, the Department of Finance shall review all statutes enacted and executive orders issued during such calendar year which contain provisions relating to Sections 2229 and 2230. The department shall cause to be included in each Budget Bill the amount necessary to provide for reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for the net property tax revenue losses and for reimbursement to cities and counties for the net revenue losses caused by any sales or use tax exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1135.)
-------------------------------------------

2232.

Any funds received by a local agency or school district pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may be used for any public purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1256, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

2233.

(a) The Director of Finance shall include in the Governor’s Budget an appropriation for a statute which has an otherwise minimal fiscal effect on local agencies or school districts if the director determines that the fiscal effect of the statute and other related statutes is, in the aggregate, significant.

(b) No claim shall be made pursuant to Sections 2229 and 2231, nor shall any payment be made on claims submitted pursuant to Sections 2229 and 2231, unless such claims exceed two hundred dollars ($200), provided that a county superintendent of schools or county may submit a combined claim on behalf of direct service districts or special districts within their county if the combined claim exceeds two hundred dollars ($200) even if the individual direct service or special district’s claims do not each exceed two hundred dollars ($200). The county superintendent of schools or county shall determine if the submission of such combined claim is economically feasible and shall be responsible for disbursing such funds to each direct service or special district. Such combined claims may be filed only when the superintendent of schools or county is the fiscal agent for such districts. All subsequent claims based upon the same mandate shall only be filed in such combined form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1638, Sec. 5.   Effective October 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

2235.

Claims for direct and indirect costs filed pursuant to Sections 2229 and 2231 shall be filed in the manner prescribed by the State Controller.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2234 (as amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 105) by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2237.2.

(a) Annually, no later than 90 days following the end of the fiscal year, each local agency (as defined in Section 95) shall report to the Controller any ad valorem property tax levied by or on behalf of the local agency for the current fiscal year at a rate which is in excess of the limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the Constitution. For purposes of this section, ad valorem property taxes levied by the county or by a special district governed by the board of supervisors at a rate in excess of the limitation prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the Constitution shall be reported by the county auditor.

(b) The information to be reported pursuant to this section shall be provided on a form to be specified by the Controller and shall include all of the following information:

(1) A description of the local obligation or indebtedness for which the tax is levied.

(2) The reason for the exemption from the limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the Constitution.

(3) The date of the election authorizing each tax levy, the results of the election, and a copy of the ballot measure, if the levy was authorized by election. 

(4) The tax rate and the total revenues expected to be generated in the fiscal year.

(5) Actual revenues, if any, generated from the levy in the prior fiscal year and actual expenditures, if any, made in the prior year for the local obligation or indebtedness for which the tax was levied.

(6) Any other information relating to the levy of property tax at a rate in excess of the limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA which the Controller deems relevant.

(c) With respect to ad valorem property tax levies in excess of the rate limitation prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the Constitution which have been authorized by the voters but not collected during the fiscal year, each local agency shall report the information specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (b).

(d) The official of each local agency responsible for submitting the report required by this section shall certify that the information submitted is, to the best of his or her knowledge, true and accurate.

(e) The Controller shall require that any property tax levied at a rate in excess of the limit prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the Constitution be reported in the manner specified in this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, an “ad valorem property tax” shall be any tax or assessment imposed on the basis of the value of the real property, including any special ad valorem assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 45, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2237.4.

If a local agency fails to file by October 1 each year a report required by Section 2237.2, the Controller and the county auditor in the succeeding fiscal year shall reduce the payment they are required to make to such jurisdiction based on claims filed pursuant to Section 16113 of the Government Code. The reduction shall be 10 percent of the prior year’s payment or five thousand dollars ($5,000), whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 45, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2237.5.

For the 1979–80 fiscal year and thereafter, except as provided by subdivision (b) of Section 12 of Article XIII of the Constitution, for purposes of computing tax rates on the unsecured tax roll, the county auditor may add to the 1-percent rate the rate levied on the prior year’s secured tax roll for indebtedness approved by the voters prior to July 1, 1978, and bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property approved by two-thirds of the voters on or after June 4, 1986, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1457, Sec. 22.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Method of Providing Reimbursement Revenue for Costs Mandated by State [2240. - 2246.2.]

2240.

Revenues to reimburse local agencies and school districts pursuant to the provisions of Section 2229 or 2230 shall be determined and appropriated as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 879, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2241.

When a bill is introduced in the Legislature, and each time a bill is amended, the Legislative Counsel shall determine whether the bill requires state reimbursement to local agencies or school districts pursuant to Section 2229 or 2230. The Legislative Counsel shall make this determination known in the digest of the bill and shall describe in the digest the basis for this determination.

In making any determination required by this section the Legislative Counsel shall disregard any provision in a bill which would make inoperative the reimbursement requirements of Section 2229 or 2230, and shall make his or her determination irrespective of any provision to that effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 879, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

2242.

Whenever the Legislative Counsel determines that a bill will require state reimbursement to a local agency or a school district as provided in Section 2229 or 2230, the Department of Finance shall prepare estimates of the amount of reimbursement which will be required. The estimates shall be prepared for the respective committees of each house of the Legislature which consider taxation measures and appropriation measures and shall be prepared prior to any hearing on such a bill by any such committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 879, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

2243.

The estimate required by Section 2242 shall be the amount estimated to be required during the first fiscal year of a bill’s operation in order to reimburse local agencies and school districts, pursuant to Section 2229 or 2230, for lost revenue mandated by the bill. In the event that the operative date of such a bill does not begin on July 1, the estimate shall also include the amount estimated to be required for reimbursement for the next following full fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 879, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

2244.

In the event that a bill is amended on the floor of either house, whether by adoption of the report of a conference committee or otherwise, in such a manner as to require reimbursement pursuant to Section 2229 or 2230, the Legislative Counsel shall immediately inform, respectively, the Speaker of the Assembly and the President of the Senate of this fact. The notification from the Legislative Counsel shall be published in the journal of the respective houses of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 879, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

2246.2.

The Director of Finance shall include in the Governor’s Budget an appropriation for statutes identified pursuant to Section 2246 which increase the penalty for a crime or infraction if the director determines that the statutes would increase the total detention and probation costs to local agencies by more than 1 percent of the actual statewide detention and probation costs incurred in the preceding fiscal year, as compiled by the Controller pursuant to Section 12463 of the Government Code. The director shall rely on written requests from affected local agencies, supported by fiscal data. Any funds so appropriated shall be used to reimburse only one-half of the costs incurred by local agencies in excess of the amounts determined to be 1 percent of the actual detention and probation costs to local agencies in the preceding fiscal year. Funds shall be appropriated to the Controller for allocation and disbursement to local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1638, Sec. 6.   Effective October 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Maximum Property Tax Rates [2260. - 2267.]

2260.

The maximum property tax rates for local agencies shall be those established pursuant to the provisions of this article or of Article 6, 7 or 8 of this chapter (commencing with Section 2201) and shall exclude the following from the determination thereof: (1) any property tax rate levied to pay the cost of interest and redemption charges on bonded or other indebtedness which was authorized prior to the effective date of this section, together with any reserve or sinking funds required in connection therewith; (2) any property tax rate levied to pay the cost of interest and redemption charges on bonded or other indebtedness which was authorized after the effective date of this section by the voters of such agency, together with any reserve or sinking funds required in connection therewith; (3) any property tax rate levied to pay the cost of interest charges on notes of a local agency issued in anticipation of bonds, if such bonds were authorized prior to the effective date of this section or were authorized by the voters of such agency after the effective date of this section, and if the principal amount of any such notes is payable only from proceeds of the sale of such bonds; (4) any property tax rate levied to pay the cost of interest and redemption charges on refunding bonds or on bonds issued pursuant to Section 53541 of the Government Code or Section 71960 of the Water Code, together with any reserve or sinking funds required in connection therewith; (5) any property tax rate levied to pay the cost of retirement and pension benefits or plans which are being provided pursuant to provisions of a city or county charter or which have been specifically approved by the voters of a local agency; (6) any property tax rate levied to pay the cost of payments or contributions which are required to be made to a special fund by specific provision of a city or county charter; (7) any property tax rate levied pursuant to a city charter procedure ordinance for the purpose of paying principal and interest on assessment bonds or for the purpose of paying annual costs of maintenance and operation of improvements financed pursuant to city charter procedure, when the levy is made in relation to benefits derived and not in accordance with the last equalized city or county assessment roll; and (8) any property tax rate levied on behalf of a county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------

2260.5.

For the purpose of establishing maximum property tax rates, whenever there is a comparison of rates between two or more years that have different assessment ratios or methods of expressing the tax rate, the rates and ratios shall be adjusted as provided in Section 135.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

2261.

The maximum property tax rate which may be levied by any county for general purposes shall be the combination of all countywide property tax rates which were levied for general county purposes in either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year, at the option of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2261.1.

(a) Any county which was providing structural fire protection services in unincorporated areas of the county during the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal years and which did not levy a property tax for such services as provided in Section 25643 of the Government Code, may establish a maximum property tax rate for such areas as provided in this section. The maximum property tax rate for such areas shall be determined in the manner provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2264.

(b) Whenever a maximum property tax rate has been established for an unincorporated area as provided in subdivision (a), such unincorporated area shall be a “special district”, as provided in Section 2216, for all purposes of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------

2261.2.

Whenever a county board of supervisors adopts the provisions of Sections 42649 and 85265.5 of the Education Code and thereby transfers certain duties of the county auditor to the county superintendent of schools as provided therein, the maximum tax rate of the county shall, commencing with the fiscal year following the effective date of such transfer, be decreased by an amount which, if levied in such fiscal year, would produce annual revenues equivalent to the expenditures from the county general fund used to provide such services of the county auditor in the fiscal year immediately prior to the date of the transfer of functions to the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

2262.

The maximum property tax rate which may be levied by any city shall be:

(1) For general law cities, the aggregate of all citywide property tax rates which were levied for general city purposes in either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year, at the option of the city council; provided that if the aggregate of such property tax rates was less than one dollar ($1) in both the 1971–1972 and the 1972–1973 fiscal years, the maximum property tax rate for such cities shall be one dollar ($1). In addition, any property tax rate authorized by the voters of a city as provided in Section 43068 of the Government Code which was not levied as part of the aggregate of citywide taxes in the fiscal year selected by the city council pursuant to this subdivision may also be levied.

(2) For charter cities, the maximum rate, or rates, specified in the charter; provided that any rate in excess of such maximum rate which is authorized by Section 43072 of the Government Code or by Section 35 of Chapter 1 of the Statutes of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session) and which was levied during either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year may continue to be levied. If no maximum rate is specified in the charter, or if a maximum rate is specified but such rate is applicable only to a portion of the purposes for which such city is levying an ad valorem property tax, the maximum rate shall be the rate levied by the city for either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year, at the option of the city council. In addition, if the voters of a charter city, pursuant to provisions of the charter or of general law, have authorized an additional rate, such augmented rate shall be the maximum property tax rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2262.2.

A local agency or district formed by a city after the effective date of this chapter to take over and perform services theretofore provided by a county service area for the same territory, may adjust, or cause to be adjusted, upwards, its maximum property tax rate in that territory by an amount equal to the tax rate previously levied, or which could have been levied, by the county service area (including any additional levies permitted by Section 2280), had it continued to provide those services for the territory provided that the county service area is no longer empowered to tax or does not tax the territory covered by the city’s local agency or district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

2263.

The maximum property tax rate which may be levied by, or on behalf of, a special district formed prior to January 1, 1972, shall be:

(1) The maximum property tax rate authorized by the enabling statute under which the district is organized; provided that any rate in excess of such maximum rate which is authorized by Section 35 of Chapter 1 of the Statutes of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session) and which was levied during either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year may continue to be levied.

(2) If no such maximum property tax rate is provided by statute, or if a maximum property tax rate is provided but such rate is applicable only to a portion of the purposes for which such district is levying an ad valorem property tax, the maximum rate shall be the rate levied by, or on behalf of, the district for either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year, at the option of the governing body of the district. If a district operates on a calendar year, the maximum rate which may be levied pursuant to this subdivision shall be that levied in either calendar 1972 or calendar 1973, at the option of the governing body of the district.

(3) In addition, if the voters of a district, pursuant to provisions of the enabling statute under which the district is organized, have authorized an additional rate, such augmented rate shall be the maximum property tax rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2263.1.

This section shall apply only to special districts formed between January 1, 1972, and the effective date of this section.

(a) For special districts the governing body of which is separately and directly elected by the qualified voters of the district, in the event that a maximum property tax rate cannot be established for such district pursuant to the provisions of Section 2263, the governing body may, by resolution, apply to the board of supervisors of the county in which the district, or the major portion of the assessed value thereof, is located to determine the maximum tax rate. Upon receipt of such a resolution the board of supervisors shall, by resolution, determine the maximum tax rate for the district. Such rate shall be sufficient to permit the district to provide the programs and services for which it was formed.

(b) For special districts the governing body of which is a city council, a board of supervisors or is appointed to office, in the event that a maximum tax rate cannot be established for such district pursuant to the provisions of Section 2263, the governing body may, by resolution, apply to the local agency formation commission in the county in which the district is located to determine the maximum tax rate. Upon receipt of such a resolution the local agency formation commission shall hold a hearing and shall determine the maximum tax rate for the district. Such rate shall be sufficient to permit the district to provide the programs and services for which it was formed. Procedures for holding such a hearing and making such a determination shall follow, as nearly as is practicable, the procedures provided in the District Reorganization Act (Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code) for hearing and determination by a local agency formation commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2263.2.

After the effective date of this section the formation of a special district shall not be effective for property tax purposes unless a maximum property tax rate has been established by the voters of the district pursuant to the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 2285) provided, however, that the maximum property tax rate for a maintenance district formed pursuant to the Improvement Act of 1911 or the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 may be established prior to or concurrently with the formation of such district by any petition or by supplemental written consent executed by property owners holding at least 60 percent in area of the land to be benefited. The procedures for such petition or supplemental written consent shall follow the procedures provided in the Majority Protest Act of 1931.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2263.4.

Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of Section 2263, the maximum property tax rate which may be levied by, or on behalf of, a harbor district shall be the greater of three cents ($0.03) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation or the rate levied by, or on behalf of, the district for either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year, at the option of the governing body of the district. If a district operates on a calendar year, the maximum rate which may be levied pursuant to this subdivision shall be the greater of three cents ($0.03) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation or that levied in either calendar 1972 or calendar 1973, at the option of the governing body of the district. Beginning in the 1981–82 fiscal year, the maximum property tax rate which may be levied shall be the greater of 75/10,000 of 1 percent of assessed valuation or the rate levied by, or on behalf of, the district for either the 1971–72 or the 1972–73 fiscal year, at the option of the governing body of the district. If a district operates on a calendar year, the maximum rate which may be levied pursuant to this section shall be greater of 75/10,000 of 1 percent of assessed valuation or that levied in either calendar year 1972 or calendar year 1973, at the option of the governing body of the district.

In addition, if the voters of a district, pursuant to provisions of the enabling statute under which the district is organized, have authorized an additional rate, such augmented rate shall be the maximum property tax rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1208, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

2264.

In the event that a local agency elects to follow the provisions of Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 2131) of this division, for levying a property tax rate in certain special districts, the maximum property tax rate for such districts shall be determined as provided in this section. For all purposes of this chapter, such maximum property tax rate shall be applied to the total assessed value within such district. In such situations the actual property tax rate for such a district shall be levied in each county in which the district is situated as provided in Part 3.5 without regard to the limitations provided elsewhere in this article.

(a) If a maximum property tax rate is provided in the enabling statute under which the district is organized, the maximum property tax rate for the district shall be the rate provided by statute.

(b) If no maximum property tax rate is provided by statute, the maximum property tax rate for such a district shall be the rate determined by dividing the receivable property tax revenue of the district by the total assessed value within the district. The governing body of a district may elect, at its option, to use either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year as the basis for determining the maximum property tax rate pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Receivable property tax revenue” means the amount of revenue from ad valorem property taxation which a district would have received in any fiscal year if the district’s ad valorem property taxes for such year had been collected for all taxable property within the district, without regard to delinquencies, penalties or other modifications or adjustments.

(2) “Total assessed value within the district” means all assessed value in each county in which the district is located which is subject to ad valorem property taxation by, or on behalf of, such district; plus the assessed value in each such county which is attributable to the homeowners’ property tax exemption and to the business inventory property tax exemption and which otherwise would have been subject to ad valorem property taxation by, or on behalf of, such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2265.

In lieu of the maximum property tax rates established by other provisions of this article, the voters of a local agency may establish a maximum property tax rate for such agency pursuant to the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 2285).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2266.

This section shall provide an alternate procedure to the other provisions of this chapter for establishing maximum property tax rates.

The maximum property tax rate which may be levied by, or on behalf of, a local agency shall be a rate equivalent to the following:

(1) The maximum property tax rate which could have been levied for such agency pursuant to any provision of this chapter for the prior fiscal year, plus

(2) A property tax rate, not less than zero, on the secured roll which would produce an amount of property tax revenue equal to the following:

(a) The amount of property tax revenue which would be received by such agency in the current fiscal year by levying the rate identified in subparagraph (1) of this paragraph against the agency’s total assessed value for the current fiscal year, subtracted from

(b) The amount of property tax revenue which would be received by such agency in the current fiscal year if its property tax revenue from the prior year were to change by a percentage equal to the following: the percentage change in the population of the agency (as determined pursuant to Section 2227 or 2228) plus the percentage change in the cost of living (as determined pursuant to Section 2212) which is applicable to the agency.

As used in this section “property tax revenue from the prior year” means the revenue which would have been received by a local agency in the prior fiscal year by levying the maximum property tax rate authorized by this chapter against the total assessed value for such year.

As used in this section “total assessed value” means all assessed value subject to ad valorem property taxation by a local agency plus assessed value attributable to the homeowners’ property tax exemption and to the business inventory property tax exemption.

Any property tax rate established pursuant to this section shall be the maximum property tax rate for a local agency until such rate is subsequently changed or adjusted pursuant to the provisions of this section or other provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2266.1.

In the event that a special district employs a system of ad volorem property taxation in which the district assessment roll is not based upon the full cash value of the assessed property, the provisions of Section 2266 shall not apply to such district, and this section shall provide an alternate procedure to the other provisions of this article for establishing the maximum property tax rate of such district.

The maximum property tax rate which may be levied by, or on behalf of, a special district subject to the provisions of this section shall be a rate equivalent to the following:

(1) The rate established for such special district pursuant to the provisions of Section 2263, plus

(2) A rate obtained by multiplying the rate determined pursuant to subdivision (1) by the percentage change in the total assessed value of property within the district as shown on the current equalized secured assessment roll of the county, and the total assessed value of property within the district as shown on the equalized secured assessment roll of the county for the 1972–1973 fiscal year. 

As used in the section, “total assessed value” shall have the same meaning as in Section 2266.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2266.2.

As used in Section 2266, “property tax revenue” includes revenue distributed in the prior fiscal year to local government by the state pursuant to the Timber Yield Tax Law (Part 18.5 (commencing with Section 38101), Division 2).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

2266.5.

This section shall provide an alternate procedure to the other provisions of this article for establishing maximum property tax rates.

In the event that a chartered city assesses property and collects taxes and transfers such functions to the county in which such city is located, the maximum tax rate for such city in the first fiscal year in which the transfer is effective shall be determined by multiplying the city’s maximum tax rate for the preceding fiscal year by the same factor established by the State Board of Equalization to determine the public utility roll supplied to the city for such preceding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 631.)
-------------------------------------------

2267.

In the event that an error or omission occurred in determining the property tax rate which was levied by, or on behalf of, a local agency in either the 1971–1972 fiscal year or the 1972–1973 fiscal year, the maximum property tax rate for such agency for purposes of this chapter shall be the property tax rate which would have been levied, in either such fiscal year, if such error or omission had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Additional Property Tax Rates [2270. - 2280.1.]

2270.

A local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter (commencing with Section 2201) to pay the cost of: (1) interest and redemption charges on bonded or other indebtedness authorized prior to the effective date of this section, together with any reserve or sinking funds required in connection therewith; (2) interest and redemption charges on bonded or other indebtedness authorized after the effective date of this section by the voters of such agency, together with any reserve or sinking funds required in connection therewith; (3) interest charges on notes of a local agency issued in anticipation of bonds, if such bonds were authorized prior to the effective date of this section or were authorized by the voters of such agency after the effective date of this section, and if the principal amount of any such notes is payable only from proceeds of the sale of such bonds; (4) interest and redemption charges on refunding bonds or on bonds issued pursuant to Section 53541 of the Government Code or Section 71960 of the Water Code, together with any reserve or sinking funds required in connection therewith; (5) retirement and pension benefits or plans which are being provided pursuant to provisions of a city or county charter or which have been specifically approved by the voters of a local agency; and (6) payments or contributions which are required to be made to a special fund by specific provision of a city or county charter; provided, however, that this subdivision shall not apply to any city or county whose charter contains a provision permitting the governing body to suspend or defer such payments or contributions upon making a finding that statutory limitations on ad valorem property taxation limit the ability of the city or county to make such payments or contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------

2271.

A local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter (commencing with Section 2201) to pay costs mandated by the federal government or costs mandated by the courts or costs mandated by initiative enactment, which are not funded by federal or state government.

The Controller may audit any rate imposed under this section and any data related to the establishment thereof. If the Controller determines that such rate exceeds a rate which would be necessary to meet the federally mandated, initiative-mandated or court-mandated costs, or if the Controller determines that such rate has been levied to pay any cost mandated by a court which has resulted from litigation entered into in order to avoid the property tax rate limits established by this chapter, or if the Controller determines that a local agency has erroneously concluded that it is subject to costs mandated by the courts or costs mandated by the federal government, he shall immediately notify the local agency of such determination, and the local agency shall reduce its property tax rate by an appropriate amount for the next succeeding fiscal year. In the event that a local agency fails to make such a reduction in its property tax rate, the Controller shall request the Attorney General to bring an action under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure to force a reduction in the rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2271.1.

An additional property tax heretofore or hereafter levied pursuant to the provisions of Section 2271 shall not be invalidated and may continue to be levied to meet recurring costs resulting from any program or activity undertaken or implemented by a local agency in order to comply with a mandate by the federal government, by initiative enactment or the courts, notwithstanding the reversal, repeal, stay, or invalidation of such mandate, if the reversal, repeal, stay, or invalidation of the mandate occurred or occurs after the local agency has made such additional levy to satisfy continuing contractual obligations entered into in order to undertake, implement or continue the mandated program or activity.

The additional rate shall not continue to be levied if the reversal, repeal, stay, or invalidation of the mandate is upheld by a final court order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------

2271.15.
